Utah statutes.
9-1-201.2.   Organization of department -- Jurisdiction of executive director.

The executive director:

(1)  may organize the department in any fashion considered appropriate, unless otherwise expressly provided by statute; and

(2)  may consolidate personnel and service functions to effectuate efficiency and economy within the department.



Enacted by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

